Utah statutes.
58-22-602.    Plans, specifications, reports, maps, sketches, surveys, drawings, documents, and plats to be sealed.

(1)  Any final plan, specification, and report of a building or structure erected in this state shall bear the seal of a professional engineer or professional structural engineer licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Section 58-22-305, in Title 58, Chapter 3a, Architect Licensing Act, and by the State Construction Code or an approved code under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act.

(2)  Any final plan, specification, and report prepared by, or under the supervision of, the professional engineer or professional structural engineer shall bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional structural engineer when submitted to a client, when filed with public authorities, or when submitted to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit, even if the practice is exempt from licensure under Section 58-22-305.

(3)  Any final plan, map, sketch, survey, drawing, document, plat, and report shall bear the seal of the professional land surveyor licensed under this chapter when submitted to a client or when filed with public authorities.

